Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.408

Photograph, picture, negative.

"Photograph," along with the terms "picture" and "negative," means a pictorial representation, whether produced through photographic or other means, including, but not limited to, digital data imaging.

[ 1990 c 250 s 21.]